Tennessee, session 114, HB2310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-33-107, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) Each appropriate regulatory authority, pursuant to title 63 or this title, shall
report quarterly to the department of health the number and type of disciplinary actions
taken pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2310
012127
- 1 -